Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2207.21
Certified residential real property appraiser, defined.

Certified residential real property appraiser means a person who holds a valid credential as a certified residential real property appraiser issued under the Real Property Appraiser Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 76-2210.02;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.05;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 10.
April 12, 2018